Maryland, session 2025, HB1216.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–903.
(a) The following vehicles are exempt from the registration fees specified in this
subtitle:
(1) A vehicle that is owned and operated by the United States, this State,
or any political subdivision of this State;
(2) A vehicle that is owned by a volunteer fire company incorporated in this
State or by a rescue squad and that is used for fire fighting or ambulance purposes;
(3) A canteen wagon of a recognized fire buff organization, as certified by
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1216*

HOUSE BILL 1216
the International Fire Buffs Association;
(4) A vehicle owned and operated by the Civil Air Patrol;
(5) A vehicle owned and operated by a unit of a national veterans’
organization;
(6) A vehicle owned and operated by a Maryland chapter of the American
Red Cross;
(7) A motor vehicle and trailer known as the “40–8 box car” that is owned
and operated only for social or charitable purposes by any voiture of the Forty and Eight of
the American Legion, Department of Maryland;
(8) A vehicle owned by, or leased to, and personally used by a veteran who:
(i) As designated or classified by the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs, has lost the use of a hand, arm, or leg, or is totally disabled; or
(ii) Has a permanent impairment of both eyes so that:
1. The central visual acuity is 20/200 or less in the better eye,
with corrective glasses; or
2. There is a field defect in which the peripheral field has
contracted to such an extent that the widest diameter of visual field subtends an angular
distance no greater than 20 degrees in the better eye;
(9) A vehicle owned and personally used by an individual who is the
surviving spouse of a deceased disabled veteran, as defined under § 7–208 of the Tax –
Property Article; [and]
(10) A VEHICLE OWNED BY, OR LEASED TO, AND PERSONALLY USED BY
AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS:
(I) A PURPLE HEART RECIPIENT;
(II) A MEDAL OF HONOR RECIPIENT;
(III) A SILVER STAR RECIPIENT;
(IV) A BRONZE STAR RECIPIENT; OR
(V) A MEMBER OF A GOLD STAR FAMILY; AND
(11) A Type I or Type II school vehicle owned and operated by a religious

HOUSE BILL 1216 3
organization.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.